California statutes. Corporations Code
The principal terms of the merger shall be approved by the members (Section 5034) of each constituent corporation and by each other person or persons whose approval of an amendment of articles is required by the articles; and the approval by the members (Section 5034) or such other person or persons required by this section may be given before or after the approval by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

6013.

Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement by the chairperson of its board, president or a vice president, and secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 54.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6014.

After approval of a merger by the board and any approval by the members (Section 5034) or other person or persons required by Section 6012, the surviving corporation shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation attached stating the total number of memberships of each class entitled to vote on the merger, identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required, and stating that the principal terms of the agreement in the form attached were duly approved by the required vote of the members and (if applicable) such other person or persons. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation contained in the merger agreement shall thereupon be effective (subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008 and subject to the provisions of Section 6018) and the several parties thereto shall be one surviving corporation. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the merger agreement separate from the officers’ certificates attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 15.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6015.

(a) Any amendment to the agreement may be adopted and the agreement so amended may be approved by the board and, if it changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the members (Section 5034) or other person or persons, as required by Section 6012, of any constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement.

(b) If the agreement so amended is approved as provided in subdivision (a), the agreement so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

6016.

The board may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent corporations, without further approval by the members (Section 5034) or other persons entitled to approve the merger at any time before the merger is effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6017.

A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving corporation and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles contained in the agreement of merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6018.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 6010, the merger of any number of corporations with any number of foreign corporations may be effected if the foreign corporations are authorized by the laws under which they are formed to effect the merger. The surviving corporation may be any one of the constituent corporations and shall continue to exist under the laws of the state or place of its incorporation.

(b) If the surviving corporation is a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation, the merger proceedings with respect to that corporation and any disappearing corporation shall conform to the provisions of this chapter governing the merger of corporations, but if the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) and Section 6012, the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of incorporation of the surviving corporation.

(c) If the surviving corporation is a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation, the agreement and the officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation shall be filed as provided in Section 6014 and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008, the merger shall be effective as to each corporation; and each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall by virtue of the filing automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(d) If the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which it is organized, but shall be effective as to any disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state as required by this subdivision. There shall be filed as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations the documents described in any one of the following paragraphs:

(1) A copy of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving foreign corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger, which copy shall be certified by the public officer having official custody of the original.

(2) An executed counterpart of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger.

(3) A copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent domestic corporation attached, which officers’ certificates shall conform to the requirements of Section 6014.

(e) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to subdivision (d) is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of the domestic corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations as of the date of filing in this state. Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (d) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state regardless of the time of effectiveness as to a domestic disappearing corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 16.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6019.

If an agreement of merger is entered into between a nonprofit corporation and a business corporation: (i) Sections 6011, 6012, 6014, and 6015 shall apply to any constituent public benefit corporation; (ii) Sections 8011, 8011.5, 8012, 8014, and 8015 shall apply to any constituent mutual benefit corporation; (iii) Sections 6014 and 6015 and subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9640 shall apply to any constituent religious corporation; and (iv) Sections 1101, 1101.1, 1103, and 1104 shall apply to any constituent business corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

6019.1.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Sections 6010 and 9640, any one or more corporations may merge with one or more other business entities (Section 5063.5). One or more other domestic corporations and foreign corporations (Section 5053) may be parties to the merger. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, such a merger may be effected only if:

(1) In a merger in which a domestic corporation or domestic other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(2) In a merger in which a foreign corporation is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is
 organized to effect the merger.

(3) In a merger in which a foreign other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(b) Each corporation and each other party which desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The board and the members (Section 5034) of each corporation which desires to merge, and each other person or persons, if any, whose approval of an amendment of the articles of that corporation is required by the articles or bylaws shall approve the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each other party by those persons authorized or required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized. The parties desiring to merge shall be
 parties to the agreement of merger and other persons, including a parent party (Section 5064.5), may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of incorporation or organization of each party and the identity of the surviving party.

(3) The amendments, if any, subject to Sections 5810 and 5816, to the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, to be effected by the merger. The name of the surviving corporation may be, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 5122 and subdivision (b) of Section 9122, the same as, or similar to, the name of a disappearing party to the merger.

(4) The manner, if any, of converting the memberships of each of the constituent corporations into shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party; and, if any memberships of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, the cash, rights, securities, or other property which the holders of those memberships are to receive in exchange for the memberships, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to, or in lieu of, shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving corporation or surviving other business entity.

(5) Any other details or provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is
 organized, including, if an unincorporated association is a party to the merger, Section 18370, or if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.12, if a domestic general partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 16911, or, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.12.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired.

(c) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the agreement of merger if the amendment is approved by each constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement of merger. If the agreement of merger as so amended and approved is also approved by each of the other
 parties to the agreement of merger, as so amended it shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(d) The board of a constituent corporation may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other parties to the agreement of merger, without further approval by the members (Section 5034) or other persons, at any time before the merger is effective.

(e) Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement of merger by its chairperson of the board, president or a vice president, and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(f) After required approvals of the merger by each constituent corporation and each
 other party to the merger, the surviving party shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent domestic and foreign corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares or membership interests of each class, if any, entitled to vote on the merger (and identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required), that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by that corporation by a vote of a number of shares or membership interests of each class entitled to vote, if any, which equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, and, if applicable, by that other person or persons whose approval is required.

If equity securities of a parent party (Section 5064.5) are to
 be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate or certificate of merger of the controlled party shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent party was required or that the required vote was obtained. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger shall be effective upon the filing of the agreement of merger, subject to the provisions of subdivision (h). If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger, the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger pursuant to Section 1555 of the Insurance Code.

In lieu of an officers’ certificate, a certificate of merger, on a form
 prescribed by the Secretary of State, shall be filed for each constituent other business entity. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all of the managers of the limited liability company (unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement) and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement) and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement) and by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign
 constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and also by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed such officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and also by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact, and by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for such party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the signing persons.

The certificate of merger shall set forth, if a vote of the shareholders, members,
 partners, or other holders of interests of a constituent other business entity was required, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the agreement of merger or its principal terms, as required, were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, and any other information required to be set forth under the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized, including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, if a domestic general partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14.
 The certificate of merger for each constituent foreign other business entity, if any, shall also set forth the statutory or other basis under which that foreign other business entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the agreement of merger separate from the officers’ certificates and certificates of merger attached thereto.

(g) A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving party to the merger, the performance of the conditions necessary
 to the adoption of any amendment to the articles, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger, and the merger of the constituent corporations, either by themselves or together with other constituent parties, into the surviving party to the merger.

(h) (1) The merger of domestic corporations with foreign corporations or foreign other business entities in a merger in which one or more other business entities is a party shall comply with subdivisions (a) and (f) and this subdivision.

(2) Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 5008 and paragraph (3), the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent corporation and domestic constituent other business entity upon filing of the agreement of merger with attachments as provided in subdivision
 (f).

(3) If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, except as provided in paragraph (4), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent foreign and domestic corporation and a certificate of merger of each constituent other business entity attached, which officers’ certificates and certificates of merger shall conform to the requirements of subdivision (f).

If one or more domestic other business entities is a disappearing party in a merger pursuant to this subdivision in which a foreign other business entity is the
 surviving entity, a certificate of merger required by the laws under which each domestic other business entity is organized, including subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, or subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, if applicable, shall also be filed at the same time as the filing of the agreement of merger.

(4) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to this subdivision is more than six months after the time of the
 effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of a domestic disappearing corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation as of the date of filing in this state.

(5) Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (f) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state or, if later, the effective date of the merger. With respect to each foreign disappearing other business entity previously registered for the transaction of intrastate business in this state, the filing of the agreement of merger pursuant to subdivision (f) automatically has the effect of a
 cancellation of registration for that foreign other business entity as of the date of filing in this state or, if later, the
 effective date of the merger, without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 11.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Merger [6020. - 6022.]

6020.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter the separate existences of the disappearing parties to the merger cease and the surviving party to the merger shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing parties to the merger and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each and trust obligations upon the property of a disappearing party in the same manner as if incurred by the surviving party to the merger.

(b) All rights of creditors and all liens and trusts upon or arising from the property of each of the constituent corporations and other parties to the merger shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that the liens and trust obligations upon property of a disappearing party shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(c) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing corporation or other party to the merger may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving party to the merger, or the surviving party to the merger may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6020.5.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter, a surviving domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following:

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, or registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company, foreign limited liability partnership, or foreign corporation that is registered or qualified to do business in California, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 18.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6021.

Whenever a domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity (Section 5063.5) having any real property in this state merges with another domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which any constituent party to the merger was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization (including this state) of any disappearing party to the merger provide substantially that the making and filing of the agreement of merger vests in the surviving party to the merger all the real property of any disappearing party to the merger, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the disappearing party to the merger is located of either (a) a certificate prescribed by the Secretary of State, or (b) a copy of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger is effected, shall evidence record ownership in the surviving party to the merger of all interest of that disappearing party to the merger in and to the real property located in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6022.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance, which is made to a constituent corporation and which takes effect or remains payable after the merger, inures to the surviving party to the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Bankruptcy Reorganizations and Arrangements [6110. - 6110.]

6110.

Any proceeding, initiated with respect to a corporation, under any applicable statute of the United States, as now existing or hereafter enacted, relating to reorganizations of corporations, shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1400) of Division 1 of Title 1, and for this purpose the reference in Chapter 14 to “shareholders” shall be deemed to be a reference to members and the reference to “this division” shall be deemed to be a reference to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 19.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Required Filings by Corporation or Its Agent [6210. - 6216.]

6210.

(a) Every corporation shall, within 90 days after the filing of its original articles and biennially thereafter during the applicable filing period, file, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement containing: (1) the name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number; (2) the names and complete business or residence addresses of its chief executive officer, secretary, and chief financial officer; (3) the street address of its principal office in California, if any; (4) the mailing address of the corporation, if different from the street address of its principal office or if the corporation has no principal office address in California; and (5) if the corporation chooses to receive renewal notices and any other
 notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, a valid electronic mail address for the corporation or for the corporation’s designee to receive those notices.

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall also designate, as the agent of the corporation for the purpose of service of process, a natural person residing in this state or any domestic or foreign or foreign business corporation that has complied with Section 1505 and whose capacity to act as an agent has not terminated. If a natural person is designated, the statement shall set forth the person’s complete business or residence street address. If a corporate agent is designated, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the applicable
 filing period for a corporation shall be the calendar month during which its original articles were filed and the immediately preceding five calendar months. The Secretary of State shall provide a notice to each corporation to comply with this section approximately three months before the close of the applicable filing period. The notice shall state the due date for compliance and shall be sent to the last address of the corporation according to the records of the Secretary of State or to the last electronic mail address according to the records of the Secretary of State if the corporation has elected to receive notices from the Secretary of State by electronic mail. Neither the failure of the Secretary of State to send the notice nor the failure of the corporation to receive it is an excuse for failure to comply with this section.

(d) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) is changed, the corporation may file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). In order to change its agent for service of process or the address of the agent, the corporation must file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). Whenever any statement is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed statement and the statement in the articles as to the agent for service of process and the address of the agent.

(e) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded by the filing of a new statement.

(f) This
 section does not place any person dealing with the corporation on notice of, or under any duty to inquire about, the existence or content of a statement filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 55.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

(a) An agent designated for service of process pursuant to Section 6210 may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that the agent is resigning. Thereupon the authority of the agent to act in that capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State forthwith shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the corporation at its principal office.

(b) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the corporation, the Secretary of State’s file number for the corporation, and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent. Similarly, a person named as an officer or director may indicate that the person was never properly appointed as the officer or director.

(c) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new form is filed pursuant to Section 6210 replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 12.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.

If a natural person who has been designated agent for service of process pursuant to Section 6210 dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state or if the corporate agent for such purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers and privileges suspended or ceases to exist, the corporation shall forthwith file a designation of a new agent conforming to the requirements of Section 6210.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6214.

Upon request of an assessor, a corporation owning, claiming, possessing or controlling property in this state subject to local assessment shall make available at the corporation’s principal office in California or at a place mutually acceptable to the assessor and the corporation a true copy of business records relevant to the amount, cost and value of all property that it owns, claims, possesses or controls within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.

Any officers, directors, employees or agents of a corporation who do any of the following are liable jointly and severally for all the damages resulting therefrom to the corporation or any person injured thereby who relied thereupon or to both:

(a) Make, issue, deliver or publish any report, circular, certificate, financial statement, balance sheet, public notice or document respecting the corporation or its memberships, assets, liabilities, business, earnings or accounts which is false in any material respect, knowing it to be false, or participate in the making, issuance, delivery or publication thereof with knowledge that the same is false in a material respect.

(b) Make or cause to be made in the books, minutes, records or accounts of a corporation any entry which is false in any material particular knowing such entry is false.

(c) Remove, erase, alter or cancel any entry in any books or records of the corporation, with intent to deceive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.

(a) The Attorney General, upon complaint of a member, director or officer, that a corporation is failing to comply with the provisions of this chapter, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5510), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5610) or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 6310), may, in the name of the people of the State of California, send to the principal office of such corporation, (or, if there is no such office, to the office or residence of the chief executive officer or secretary, of the corporation, as set forth in the most recent statement filed pursuant to Section 6210) notice of the complaint. If the answer is not satisfactory, or if there is no answer within 30 days, the Attorney General may institute, maintain or intervene in such suits, actions, or proceedings of any type in any court or tribunal of competent jurisdiction or before any administrative agency for such relief by way of injunction, the dissolution of entities, the appointment of receivers or any other temporary, preliminary, provisional or final remedies as may be appropriate to protect the rights of members or to undo the consequences of failure to comply with such requirements. In any such action, suit or proceeding there may be joined as parties all persons and entities responsible for or affected by such activity.

(b) The Attorney General may bring an action under subdivision (a) without having received a complaint, and without first giving notice of a complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Records, Reports, and Rights of Inspection [6310. - 6338.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6310. - 6313.]

6310.

If any record subject to inspection pursuant to this chapter is not maintained in written form, a request for inspection is not complied with unless and until the corporation at its expense makes such record available in written form. For the purposes of this chapter “written” or “in writing” also includes cathode ray tube and similar electronic communications methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 662, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.

Any inspection under this chapter may be made in person or by agent or attorney and the right of inspection includes the right to copy and make extracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6312.

Any right of inspection created by this chapter extends to the records of each subsidiary of a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

6313.

The rights of members provided in this chapter may not be limited by contract or the articles or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Required Records, Reports to Directors and Members [6320. - 6325.]

6320.

(a) Each corporation shall keep:

(1) Adequate and correct books and records of account;

(2) Minutes of the proceedings of its members, board and committees of the board; and

(3) A record of its members giving their names and addresses and the class of membership held by each.

(b) Those minutes and other books and records shall be kept either in written form or in any other form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form or in any combination of the foregoing. When minutes and other books and records are kept in a form capable of being converted into clearly legible paper form, the clearly legible paper form into which those minutes and other books and records are converted shall be admissible in evidence, and accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as an original paper record of the same information would have been, provided that the paper form accurately portrays the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), (d), or (f), the board shall cause an annual report to be sent to the members not later than 120 days after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that report and any accompanying material sent pursuant to this section may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20). That report shall contain in appropriate detail the following:

(1) The assets and liabilities, including the trust funds, of the corporation as of the end of the fiscal year.

(2) The principal
 changes in assets and liabilities, including trust funds, during the fiscal year.

(3) The revenue or receipts of the corporation, both unrestricted and restricted to particular purposes, for the fiscal year.

(4) The expenses or disbursements of the corporation, for both general and restricted purposes, during the fiscal year.

(5) Any information required by Section 6322.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by any report thereon of independent accountants, or, if there is no such report, the certificate of an authorized officer of the corporation that such statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation. The report shall be prepared, audited, and made available in the manner required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 12586 of the Government Code, if applicable.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any corporation which receives less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in gross revenues or receipts during the fiscal year.

(d) Where a corporation has provided, pursuant to Section 5510, for regular meetings of members less often than annually, then the report required by subdivision (a) need be made to members only with the frequency with which regular membership meetings are required,
 unless the articles or bylaws require a report more often.

(e) Subdivisions (c) and (d) notwithstanding, a report with the information required by subdivision (a) shall be furnished annually to all of the following:

(1) All directors of the corporation.

(2) Any member who requests it in writing.

(f) A corporation which in writing solicits contributions from 500 or more persons need not send the report otherwise required by subdivision (a) if it does all of the following:

(1) Includes with any written material used to solicit contributions a written statement that its latest annual report will be mailed upon request and that such request may be sent to the corporation at a name and address
 which is set forth in the statement.

The term “annual report” as used in this subdivision refers to the report required by subdivision (a).

(2) Promptly mails a copy of its latest annual report to any person who requests a copy thereof.

(3) Causes its annual report to be published not later than 120 days after the close of its fiscal year in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which its principal office is located.
